src/closed-smj-lex.txt
LEXICON GIETJAV-OBL         !^N^
 +Sg+Nom:v K ;              !^N^
 +Sg+Gen: K ;               !^N^
 +Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;        !^N^  ^C^
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;              !^N^
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;              !^N^
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;              !^N^
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;             !^N^
 +Sg+Par:t K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Nom: K ;               !^N^
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;             !^N^
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;            !^N^
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;             !^N^
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;             !^N^
 +Pl+Com:j K ;              !^N^
 

LEXICON GÁKTSA              !^N^
+Num:eQ1 GÁVTSE- ;           !^N^
+Num:iQ1 GÁVTSI- ;           !^N^
+Num: GÁKTSA- ;             !^N^
                            
LEXICON GÁVTSE-             !^N^
 +Sg+Gen: K ;              !^N^
 +Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;        !^N^ ^C^
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;             !^N^
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;             !^N^
 +Sg+Par:t K ;             !^N^
 +Pl+Nom: K ;              !^N^

LEXICON GÁVTSI-
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;            !^N^
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;             !^N^
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;            !^N^
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;           !^N^
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;            !^N^
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;            !^N^
 +Pl+Com:j K ;             !^N^
                            
                            
LEXICON GÁKTSA-             !^N^
 +Sg+Nom:a K ;              !^N^
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;              !^N^
 +Sg+Ill:áj K ; !^N^  !XXX Spiik 77 -aj
 +Ess:an K ;      !^N^
 

LEXICON AKTSE            !^N^
+Num:eQ1 AVTSE- ;           !^N^
+Num:iQ1 AVTSI- ;           !^N^
+Num: AKTS- ;             !^N^

LEXICON AVTSE-          !^N^  
 +Sg+Gen: K ;          !^N^
 +Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;        !^N^ ^C^
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;         !^N^
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;         !^N^
 +Sg+Par:t K ;         !^N^
 +Pl+Nom: K ;          !^N^

LEXICON AVTSI-
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;        !^N^
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;         !^N^
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;        !^N^
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;       !^N^
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;        !^N^
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;        !^N^
 +Pl+Com:j K ;         !^N^
                        
                    
LEXICON AKTS-           !^N^
 +Sg+Nom:e K ;          !^N^
 +Sg+Acc:e K ;          !^N^
 +Sg+Ill:áj K ;  !^N^ !XXXSpiik 77 -aj
 +Ess:an K ;        !^N^
 

LEXICON LÅGEV      !^N^           
+Num:eQ1 LÅGE- ;    !^N^
+Num:iQ1 LÅGI- ;    !^N^
+Num: LÅHK- ;      !^N^
                   
LEXICON LÅGE-      !^N^
 +Sg+Nom:v K ;    !^N^
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;    !^N^
 +Sg+Gen: K ;     !^N^
 +Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;        !^N^ ^C^
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;    !^N^
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;    !^N^
 +Sg+Par:t K ;    !^N^
 +Pl+Nom: K ;     !^N^

LEXICON LÅGI-
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;   !^N^
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;    !^N^
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;   !^N^
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;  !^N^
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;   !^N^
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;   !^N^
 +Pl+Com:j K ;    !^N^
                   
                   
LEXICON LÅHK-      !^N^
 +Sg+Ill:åj K ;    !^N^
 +Ess:en K ;       !^N^
                   
                   
LEXICON AKTALÅGENAN  !^N^
+Num: AKTALÅGENAN-NIE ;  !^N^
+Num:Q1 AKTALÅGENAN-OBL ;      !^N^
                   
LEXICON AKTALÅGENAN-NIE    !^N^
 +Sg+Nom:#lågenan K ;     !^N^
 +Sg+Ill:j#lågenan K ;       !^N^
 +Ess:n#lågenan K ;        !^N^
                   
LEXICON AKTALÅGENAN-OBL    !^N^
 +Sg+Gen:#lågenan K ;      !^N^
 +Sg+Gen:#lågenan NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;      !^N^ ^C^
 +Sg+Acc:v#lågenan K ; !^N^
 +Sg+Ine:n#lågenan K ; !^N^
 +Sg+Ela:s#lågenan K ; !^N^
 +Sg+Com:jn#lågenan K ; !^N^
 +Sg+Par:t#lågenan K ; !^N^
 +Pl+Nom:#lågenan K ; !^N^
 +Pl+Gen:j#lågenan K ; !^N^
 +Pl+Acc:jt#lågenan K ; !^N^
 +Pl+Ill:jda#lågenan K ; !^N^
 +Pl+Ine:jn#lågenan K ; !^N^
 +Pl+Ela:js#lågenan K ; !^N^
 +Pl+Com:j#lågenan K ; !^N^
 
LEXICON ÅVTÅLÅGENAN                   !^N^
+Num+Sg+Gen:#lågenan K ;              !^N^
+Num+Sg+Gen:#lågenan NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;      !^N^ ^C^
+Num+Sg+Acc:v#lågenan K ;             !^N^
+Num+Sg+Ine:n#lågenan K ;             !^N^
+Num+Sg+Ela:s#lågenan K ;             !^N^
+Num+Sg+Com:jn#lågenan K ;            !^N^
+Num+Sg+Par:t#lågenan K ;             !^N^
+Num+Pl+Nom:#lågenan K ;              !^N^
+Num+Pl+Gen:j#lågenan K ;             !^N^
+Num+Pl+Acc:jt#lågenan K ;            !^N^
+Num+Pl+Ill:jda#lågenan K ;           !^N^
+Num+Pl+Ine:jn#lågenan K ;            !^N^
+Num+Pl+Ela:js#lågenan K ;            !^N^
+Num+Pl+Com:j#lågenan K ;             !^N^
                                      
LEXICON GUOKTALÅGENAN                 !^N^
+Num:Q1 GUOVTELÅGENAN ;               !^N^
+Num: GUOKT-LÅGENAN ;                 !^N^
                                      
LEXICON GUOVTELÅGENAN                 !^N^
 +Sg+Gen:e#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Sg+Gen:e#lågenan NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;           !^N^ ^C^
 +Sg+Ine:en#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Sg+Ela:es#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Sg+Com:ijn#lågenan K ;              !^N^
 +Sg+Par:et#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Pl+Nom:e#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Pl+Gen:ij#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Pl+Acc:ijt#lågenan K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Ill:ijda#lågenan K ;             !^N^
 +Pl+Ine:ijn#lågenan K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Ela:ijs#lågenan K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Com:ij#lågenan K ;               !^N^
                                      
LEXICON GUOKT-LÅGENAN                 !^N^
 +Sg+Nom:a#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Sg+Acc:a#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Sg+Ill:áj#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Ess:an#lågenan K ;                  !^N^
                                      
LEXICON GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN                 !^N^
+Num: GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN-NAIE ;            !^N^
+Num:Q1 GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN-OBL ;           !^N^
                                      
LEXICON GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN-NAIE            !^N^
 +Sg+Nom:#lågenan K ;                 !^N^
 +Sg+Acc:#lågenan K ;                 !^N^
 +Sg+Ill:j#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Ess:n#lågenan K ;                   !^N^
                                      
LEXICON GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN-OBL             !^N^
 +Sg+Gen:#lågenan K ;                 !^N^
 +Sg+Gen:#lågenan NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;         !^N^ ^C^
 +Sg+Ine:n#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Sg+Ela:s#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Sg+Com:jn#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Sg+Par:t#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Pl+Nom:#lågenan K ;                 !^N^
 +Pl+Gen:j#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Pl+Acc:jt#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Pl+Ill:jda#lågenan K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Ine:jn#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Pl+Ela:js#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Pl+Com:j#lågenan K ;                !^N^
                                      
LEXICON GIETJAVLÅGENAN                !^N^
+Num: GIETJAVLÅGENAN-IE ;             !^N^
+Num:Q1 GIETJAVLÅGENAN-OBL ;          !^N^
                                      
LEXICON GIETJAVLÅGENAN-IE             !^N^
 +Sg+Ill:j#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Ess:n#lågenan K ;                   !^N^
                                      
LEXICON GIETJAVLÅGENAN-OBL            !^N^
 +Sg+Nom:v#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Sg+Gen:#lågenan K ;                 !^N^
 +Sg+Gen:#lågenan NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;          !^N^ ^C^
 +Sg+Acc:v#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Sg+Ine:n#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Sg+Ela:s#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Sg+Com:jn#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Sg+Par:t#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Pl+Nom:#lågenan K ;                 !^N^
 +Pl+Gen:j#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Pl+Acc:jt#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Pl+Ill:jda#lågenan K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Ine:jn#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Pl+Ela:js#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Pl+Com:j#lågenan K ;                !^N^
                                      
LEXICON GÁKTSALÅGENAN                 !^N^
+Num:Q1 GÁVTSELÅGENAN ;               !^N^
+Num: GÁKTS-LÅGENAN ;                 !^N^
                                      

LEXICON LÅGENAN					!^N^
lågenan#gáktsa:lågenan#gákts GÁKTSA ;       !^N^
lågenan#aktse:lågenan#akts AKTSE ;                 !^N^
akta AKTALÅGENAN ;        !^N^
akta:åvtå ÅVTÅLÅGENAN ;		!^N^
guokta:guokt GUOKTALÅGENAN ;          !^N^ 
gålmmå GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN ;       !^N^
niellja:niellj GUOKTALÅGENAN ;      !^N^ 
vihtta+Num:vidá GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN-OBL ;             !^N^
guhtta+Num:gudá GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN-OBL ;         !^N^ 
gietjav:giehtja GIETJAVLÅGENAN ;       !^N^ 
gáktsa:gákts GÁKTSALÅGENAN ;       !^N^
